Utah statutes.
53A-3-402.10.   Reading Clinic -- Purpose.

(1)  The Legislature recognizes the critical importance of identifying, assessing, and assisting students with reading difficulties at an early age in order for them to have successful and productive school and life experiences.

(2)  In order to help accomplish this, there is established a Reading Clinic, hereafter referred to as the "clinic," at the University of Utah to assist educators and parents of students statewide in:

(a)  assessing elementary school students who do not demonstrate satisfactory progress in reading;

(b) providing instructional intervention to enable the students to overcome reading difficulties; and

(c)  becoming better prepared to help all students become successful readers by providing them with professional development programs in reading that are based on best practices and the most current, scientific research available through nationally and internationally recognized reading researchers and instructional specialists.

(3) (a)  The clinic shall focus primarily on students in grades one through three since research shows the need for students to become successful readers by the end of the third grade.

(b)  The clinic shall make assessment and instructional intervention services available to public education students of all ages.

(4)  The clinic shall provide these services on-site at the University of Utah and through remote access interactive technology to reach educators, parents, and students throughout the state.



Amended by Chapter 86, 2001 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 156, 2001 General Session

